Arkansas statutes. Title 2 Agriculture
Chapter 33

Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

2-33-101. Creation of commission.

There is created the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission.

History.

Acts 1963, No. 87, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-301.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1963, No. 87, § 10, provided, in part, that the State Livestock Sanitary Board and the office of State Veterinarian would be abolished effective April 1, 1963, and all their functions, etc., would be transferred to the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission and that the commission would take over all their records, etc., and all executory contracts, unless disaffirmed.

Acts 1963, No. 87, § 11, provided that effective April 1, 1963 all functions, etc., of the State Board of Finance relating to the development of the livestock industry of Arkansas would be transferred to the commission and that the commission would take over all executory contracts of the board and all of its instruments in writing that related directly to the development of the livestock and poultry industry of Arkansas.

Acts 1981, No. 867, § 1, provided that the Livestock and Poultry Commission, as created by §2-33-101 et seq. and as transferred to the Division of Livestock, Poultry, and Agriculture of the Department of Commerce (abolished), was separated from the Department of Commerce and should be an independent agency of state government to function in the same manner it functioned prior to its transfer and that the Division of Livestock, Poultry, and Agriculture was abolished.

2-33-102. Members.

The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission shall consist of seven (7) members who are residents and electors of this state to be appointed by the Governor by and with the advice and consent of the Senate for terms of seven (7) years and shall be actively engaged in the Arkansas livestock or poultry industries.

Each congressional district shall be represented by membership on the commission.

The term of office shall commence on January 15 following the expiration date of the preceding term and shall end on January 14 of the seventh year following the year in which the term commenced.

Any vacancies arising in the membership of the commission for any reason other than expiration of the terms for which the members were appointed shall be filled by appointment by the Governor and be effective until the expiration of the terms, subject to the confirmation of the Senate when it is next in session.

Before entering upon his or her duties, each member of the commission shall take, subscribe, and file in the office of the Secretary of State an oath to support the United States Constitution and the Arkansas Constitution and to faithfully perform the duties of the office upon which he or she is about to enter.

Members of the commission shall receive no pay for their services. Members of the commission may receive expense reimbursement and stipends in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.

Publisher's Notes. The terms of the members of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission are arranged so that one term expires on January 14 every year.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment added “and shall be actively engaged in the Arkansas livestock or poultry industries” in (a).

Amendments. The 2017 amendment redesignated former (a)(1) as (a); deleted former (a)(2); redesignated former (b)(1)(A) and (B) as (b)(1) and (b)(2); deleted former (b)(2) and (b)(3)(A); added present (c) through (e); and redesignated former (b)(3)(B) as (f).

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Deputy” for “Executive” in the section heading; and rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director” for “Deputy director” in the section heading and rewrote the section.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Arkansas Agriculture Department” for “Executive Director of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission” in (a)(1); substituted “and holds” for “by a recognized school of veterinary medicine and who holds” in (a)(2); substituted “Secretary of the Arkansas Agriculture Department” for “executive director” in (b)(1); and deleted former (c).

The 2019 amendment rewrote the section.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning bonding of employees, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 1011, § 5. The section was derived from Acts 1963, No. 87, §§ 7, 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-308.

Enter into cooperative work agreements with any or all federal agencies in matters relating to the functions performable by the commission including, but not limited to, general livestock and poultry disease control programs;

Receive and expend any moneys arising from federal means, grants, contributions, gratuities, or reimbursements for or on account of any of the functions at any time performable by the commission;

Cooperate with similar agencies existing in other states and with the appropriate federal agencies and appropriate other agencies of this state for the purpose of coordinating laws and rules governing the interstate movement of livestock and poultry and the products producible therefrom, with the view of safeguarding against animal diseases, insects, and pests and at the same time endeavoring to eliminate interstate trade barriers;

Cooperate with, and receive the cooperation of, all state-supported institutions of higher education in matters of mutual interest relating to the development of the livestock and poultry interests of this state;

Cooperate with the state, district, and county livestock show associations in the promotion and development of the livestock and poultry industry of this state;

Contract and be contracted with;

Take other action, not inconsistent with law, as it shall deem necessary or desirable to effectively carry out its duties;

Make modifications or adjustments in disease and pest control and eradication activities and programs as it deems necessary or appropriate to enable it to carry out its responsibilities with respect to such activities and programs;

Obtain, upon majority vote of the commission, health records of livestock and poultry, including records of livestock and poultry produced, sold, processed, or otherwise handled, to enable it to effectively administer and enforce its rules and laws relating to disease or pest control and eradication programs; and

Prescribe, by administrative rule, the method and manner for testing and vaccination of livestock or poultry located within the state but such authority shall not interfere with farmer vaccination of his or her own product.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment redesignated former (a)(1) as (a); in present (a), substituted “Authority” for “Full authority”, deleted “sanitary” preceding “work in this state”, and inserted “including authority to promulgate . . . affecting livestock and poultry”; deleted former (a)(2); in (b)(1), substituted “any or all federal agencies” for “the several federal departments and agencies” and deleted “such as brucellosis, tuberculosis, hog cholera, scabies, pullorum, and leucosis” at the end; redesignated former (b)(2)(A)(i) as (b)(2); deleted former (b)(2)(A)(ii); deleted former (b)(2)(B); added present (b)(8) through (b)(10); and added (c).

Publisher's Notes. These sections, concerning authority to stop vehicles, rules, regulations, and orders, and violations in interstate movement of livestock and poultry, were repealed by Acts 2017, No. 1011, §§ 7-9. The sections were derived from the following sources:

2-33-108. Acts 1969, No. 633, § 1; 1985, No. 150, § 5; 1985, No. 151, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-321.

2-33-109. Acts 1963, No. 87, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-310.

2-33-110. Acts 1959, No. 178, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-315; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 191.

Before the close of each fiscal year, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall determine the amount of moneys which will remain at the end of the fiscal year into the account from fees collected under this section and shall allow the moneys to be carried forward and made available for the same purposes in the next succeeding fiscal year.

(1)All materials, data, and information received by the laboratory are confidential and are not subject to examination or disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.

(1)The laboratory shall be administered by the Department of Agriculture.

Additional laboratory duties and functions assigned under subdivision (d)(2)(A) of this section shall be funded by the department and not by the special revenues established in subsection (b) of this section.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2005, No. 2125, § 22, provided:

“TYPE 2 TRANSFER. Effective July 1, 2005, all duties, functions, records, property, obligations, personnel, and authority to levy and collect diagnostic and laboratory fees, pursuant to Arkansas Code §2-33-111 and §2-33-112, for the Springdale Laboratory of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission are hereby transferred by a Type 2 transfer from the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission to the Division of Agriculture of the University of Arkansas.”

Acts 2010, No. 229, § 26, provided: “Effective July 1, 2005, all duties, functions, records, property, obligations, personnel, and authority to levy and collect diagnostic and laboratory fees, pursuant to Arkansas Code §2-33-111 and §2-33-112, for the Springdale Laboratory of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission are hereby transferred by a Type 2 transfer from the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission to the Division of Agriculture of the University of Arkansas.”

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in (a), deleted “and regulations” following “rules” and substituted “the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Veterinary Diagnostic Laboratory” for “its diagnostic laboratories that pertain to all species of livestock and poultry”; deleted “the provisions of” following “fees collected under” in (b)(2)(B); and added (c).

The 2019 amendment added (d).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning small animal diagnostic services, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 1011, § 11. The section was derived from Acts 1981, No. 770, § 22; 1985, No. 587, § 1;A.S.A. 1947, § 78-331; Acts 1995, No. 236, § 26.

History.

Acts 1963, No. 87, §§ 2-5; 1973, No. 725, § 1; 1983, No. 756, § 1; 1985, No. 302, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-302 — 78-305; Acts 1997, No. 250, § 6; 2017, No. 1011, § 1.

2-33-103. Organization and meetings.

The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission shall from time to time select from its membership a chair and a vice chair.

(1)The commission shall adopt and may modify rules for the conduct of its business and shall keep a record of its transactions, findings, and determinations, which shall be public.

The rules shall provide for regular meetings and for special meetings at the call of the chairman or the vice chairman if he or she is, for any reason, the acting chairman, either at his or her own instance or upon the written request of at least four (4) members.

(1)A majority of the membership of the commission shall constitute a quorum.

A majority vote of those members present shall be required for any action of the commission.

A vacancy on the commission due to death, resignation, removal, or other cause shall be filled by appointment by the Governor for the unexpired portion of the term.

The Governor may remove a member of the commission before the expiration of his or her term for cause only, after notice and a hearing in accordance with §§25-17-210 and25-17-211.

All meetings shall be open to the public.

History.

Acts 1963, No. 87, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-306; Acts 2017, No. 1011, § 2.

2-33-104. Director.

(1)The Director of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission shall be appointed by the Governor and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

The director shall report to the Secretary of the Department of Agriculture.

(1)The secretary may delegate to the director any of the powers or duties required to administer the:

Statutory duties of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission; and

Rules, orders, or directives promulgated or issued by the commission.

The director may exercise the powers and duties delegated to him or her under subdivision (b)(1) of this section in the name of the commission and of the Department of Agriculture.

History.

Acts 1963, No. 87, §§ 7, 8; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-307, 78-308; Acts 2017, No. 1011, § 3; 2019, No. 910, § 26.

2-33-105. State Veterinarian.

The Secretary of the Department of Agriculture shall employ a State Veterinarian.

The State Veterinarian shall be a person who has been granted the degree of Doctor of Veterinary Medicine and holds a current license issued by the Veterinary Medical Examining Board of this state.

History.

Acts 1963, No. 87, §§ 7, 8; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-307, 78-308; Acts 2017, No. 1011, § 4; 2019, No. 910, § 27.

2-33-106. [Repealed.]

Authority for the control, suppression, and eradication of livestock and poultry diseases and pests, and supervision of livestock and poultry work in this state, including authority to promulgate rules governing the handling, sale, and use of vaccines, antigens, and other biological products used for reportable diseases and emergencies affecting livestock and poultry, is vested in the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission.

The commission shall have the authority to:

The commission shall have the authority to make, modify, and enforce such rules and orders, not inconsistent with law, as it shall from time to time deem necessary to effectively carry out the functions performable by it.

History.

Acts 1963, No. 87, §§ 9, 12; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-309, 78-312; Acts 2017, No. 1011, § 6.

2-33-108 — 2-33-110. [Repealed.]

The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission may promulgate rules concerning services performed by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Veterinary Diagnostic Laboratory.

(1)A fee structure may be designed and maintained by the commission for the purpose of defraying the cost of diagnostic services.

(A)The fees collected shall be deposited into the State Treasury as special revenues and shall be credited to the Livestock and Poultry Special Revenue Fund.

An employee shall not knowingly disclose any materials, data, or information concerning submissions to the laboratory without the consent of the parties involved.

(A)The department may by rule assign additional laboratory duties and functions to the laboratory.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 366, § 17; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-331.1; Acts 1995, No. 236, § 25; 2017, No. 1011, § 10; 2019, No. 910, § 28.

2-33-112. [Repealed.]

All fees and revenues collected by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission shall be deposited into the State Treasury as special revenues to be credited to the Livestock and Poultry Commission Disease and Pest Control Fund.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 867, § 3;
A.S.A. 1947, § 78-332; Acts 1991, No. 403, § 1; 2017, No. 1011, § 12.

Publisher's Notes. This section may affect §§2-33-114 and2-33-307. It may be affected by §§19-5-302(8) and19-6-301(34).

Amendments. The 2017 amendment removed the (a) designation; substituted “to be credited to the Livestock and Poultry Commission Disease and Pest Control Fund” for “to be used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of the commission”; and deleted (b).

2-33-114. Federal Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Fund.

There is created in the State Treasury a fund to be known as the “Federal Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Fund”.

Federal funds as may be allotted to the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission for maintenance and operation of its cooperative programs with the United States Department of Agriculture shall be deposited into the fund created in this section.

Publisher's Notes. This section may be affected by §§2-33-113,19-5-302(8), and19-6-301(34).

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “cooperative programs with the United States Department of Agriculture” for “Agricultural Marketing Service Program” in (b).

A fee of two dollars ($2.00) per head collected on all horses sold in the state; and

On each state, district, and county fair held in the State of Arkansas there shall be levied a four and five-tenths percent (4.5%) surcharge on each paid admission to the fairs, and such levy shall be remitted to the Treasurer of State, who shall deposit the revenues into the State Treasury to the credit of the Livestock and Poultry Special Revenue Fund or the Livestock and Poultry Commission Disease and Pest Control Fund as determined by the Secretary of the Department of Agriculture.

A.C.R.C. Notes. References to “this subchapter” in §§2-33-101 —2-33-114 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment deleted former (a)(1) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; and added “or the Livestock and Poultry Commission Disease and Pest Control Fund as determined by the Secretary of the Arkansas Agriculture Department” in present (a)(2).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission” for “Livestock and Poultry Commission” in the introductory language of (a); and substituted “Department of Agriculture” for “Arkansas Agriculture Department” in (a)(2).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning Livestock and Poultry Fund funds, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 1011, § 15. The section was derived from Acts 1997, No. 766, § 5; 1999, No. 1183, § 24.

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter, concerning the livestock division, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 1011, § 16. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

2-33-201. Acts 1973, No. 454, § 1; 1977, No. 76, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-322.

2-33-202. Acts 1973, No. 454, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-330.

2-33-203. Acts 1973, No. 454, §§ 3, 5; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-324, 78-326.

2-33-204. Acts 1973, No. 454, §§ 4, 6; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-325, 78-327.

2-33-205. Acts 1973, No. 454, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-329.

2-33-206. Acts 1973, No. 454, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-328.

2-33-207. Acts 1963, No. 450, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-313.

2-33-208. Acts 1969, No. 360, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-313.1.

Preambles. Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1216, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, under the existing cooperative agreement between the State of Arkansas and the U.S. Department of Agriculture, the USDA bills Arkansas poultry and egg processors for poultry and egg grading and egg products inspection services performed by both federal and state personnel, collects such charges and remits to the state a portion of the charges collected for services of state personnel; and

“Whereas, under the present law, Act 49 of 1965, the Department of Commerce-Livestock and Poultry Commission has the authority to enter into cooperative agreements with the USDA whereby the Commerce Department will bill poultry and egg processors for poultry and egg grading and egg products inspection services performed by federal and state graders and inspectors, to collect for such services and to remit a portion to the USDA, and it would appear to be advantageous to both the State of Arkansas and the Arkansas processors of poultry and eggs for the state to become the billing and collecting agency for such services; and

“Whereas, in order for the state to assume the responsibility for such billing and collection, it is necessary that an appropriation be made to the Department of Commerce-Livestock and Poultry Commission out of which the department can make payments to the USDA of funds collected for services performed by USDA inspectors and graders;

“Now therefore … .”

Acts 1987, No. 1025, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, under the existing cooperative agreement between the State of Arkansas and the U.S. Department of Agriculture, the USDA bills Arkansas poultry and egg processors for poultry and egg grading and egg products inspection services performed by both federal and State personnel, collects such charges and remits to the State a portion of the charges collected for services of State personnel; and

“Whereas, under the present law, Act 49 of 1965, the Livestock and Poultry Commission has the authority to enter into cooperative agreements with the USDA whereby the Livestock and Poultry Commission will bill poultry and egg processors for poultry and egg grading and egg products inspection services performed by federal and State graders and inspectors, to collect for such services and to remit a portion to the USDA, and it would appear to be advantageous to both the State of Arkansas and the Arkansas processors of poultry and eggs for the State to become the billing and collecting agency for such services; and

“Whereas, in order for the State to assume the responsibility for such billing and collection, it is necessary that an appropriation be made to the Livestock and Poultry Commission out of which the Department can make payments to the USDA of funds collected for services performed by USDA inspectors and graders,

“Now therefore … .”

Effective Dates. Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1216, § 5: Feb. 12, 1976. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it would be advantageous to the State of Arkansas and to the poultry and egg processors in the state for the Department of Commerce-Livestock and Poultry Commission to bill such processors for poultry and egg grading and egg products inspection services performed by both state and federal personnel to collect for all such services and remit a portion thereof to the U.S. Department of Agriculture for services of the federal personnel; that in order to enable the Department of Commerce to perform this function, it is essential that an additional appropriation be made to the department out of which it can make remittances to the U.S. Department of Agriculture for services of federal personnel; that this act is designed to make such appropriation and should be given effect immediately so that the Department of Commerce can commence such billing and remittance program at the earliest possible date. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 1025, § 4: Apr. 14, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that because of the case Ricarte v. State, CR 86-31, a question has arisen over the validity of Act 1216 of the Extended Session of 1976; that this Act is a reenactment of the former law; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to clarify the state of the law on this issue. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 192, § 32: July 1, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Seventh General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1989 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1989 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1989.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 1963, No. 450, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-314; Acts 2017, No. 1011, § 13.

2-33-115. Fees.

The following fees shall be assessed by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission:

The commission is hereby authorized to promulgate such rules as are necessary to administer the fees, rates, or charges for services established herein.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1174, § 18; 1995, No. 236, § 27; 2017, No. 1011, § 14; 2019, No. 910, § 29.

2-33-116. [Repealed.]

2-33-201 — 2-33-208. [Repealed.]

2-33-301. Division of Markets and Grading.

There is established a Division of Markets and Grading of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission which shall have the responsibility of administering, under the direction of the commission, the provisions of the Arkansas Egg Marketing Act of 1969, §20-58-201 et seq., as amended, and the Poultry and Egg Grading Program authorized by this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 49, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-316.

2-33-302. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning civil service system, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 1011, § 17. The section was derived from Acts 1965, No. 49, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-319.

2-33-303. Poultry and egg grading program.

The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission is authorized to establish a Poultry and Egg Grading Program in this state which shall be established in cooperation with the United States Department of Agriculture and shall be in compliance with the applicable standards and requirements as prescribed by the United States Department of Agriculture for federal poultry and egg grading purposes.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 49, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-316.

2-33-304. Providing of poultry and egg grading services.

The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission shall promulgate such reasonable rules and regulations for poultry and egg grading in this state as may be necessary for the establishment and enforcement thereof.

The rules and regulations shall be in compliance with the standards and requirements established by the United States Department of Agriculture for poultry and egg grading purposes.

The commission may establish a formula or method of prorating the cost of providing the poultry grading services among the various processors or processing plants using the services.

Poultry and egg grading services shall be provided for only those processors or processing plants who make application, who shall comply with the rules and regulations promulgated by the commission, and who shall pay the cost of the services in accordance with regulations of the commission.

Any poultry or egg processor or egg processing plant failing to pay the cost of the services in accordance with the regulations promulgated by the commission shall forfeit the right to have poultry graded until the costs are paid.

All unpaid costs shall be collectible by the commission in the same manner provided by law for collection of delinquent gross receipts taxes.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 49, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-317.

2-33-305. Intergovernmental cooperation.

The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission is authorized to cooperate with the appropriate federal agencies and the appropriate agencies of this state and other states for the purpose of coordinating laws and rules governing the interstate movement of eggs and graded poultry with a view of safeguarding the public health and quality of these products and at the same time endeavoring to eliminate interstate trade barriers.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 49, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-320.

2-33-306. Agreement with federal department.

The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission is authorized to enter into a cooperative agreement with the United States Department of Agriculture whereby the commission will bill poultry and egg processors in Arkansas for poultry and egg grading and egg products inspection services performed by state and federal personnel and will collect charges for these services and remit a portion thereof to the United States Department of Agriculture for the services performed by personnel of the United States Department of Agriculture in accordance with the provisions of §§2-33-301 —2-33-305,2-33-307, and laws amendatory thereto.

History.

Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1216, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-320.1; reen. Acts 1987, No. 1025, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes. This section was reenacted by Acts 1987, No. 1025, § 1. Acts 1987, No. 834, provided that 1987 legislation reenacting acts passed in the 1976 Extended Session should not repeal any other 1987 legislation and that such other legislation would be controlling in the event of conflict.

2-33-307. Poultry and Egg Grading Fund.

All funds received by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission for providing poultry and egg grading services shall be deposited into the State Treasury. Upon receipt of the funds, the Treasurer of State shall monthly credit them as special revenues to an account to be known as the “Poultry and Egg Grading Fund”, to be used for salaries, expenses, equipment, maintenance, operation, and administrative expenses of the Poultry and Egg Grading Program of the commission as provided by law.

All funds collected by the commission from poultry and egg processors for poultry and egg grading and egg products inspection services shall be deposited into the State Treasury as special revenues and shall be credited to the Poultry and Egg Grading Fund to be used for funding the poultry and egg grading and egg products inspection program and to make payments to the United States Department of Agriculture for poultry and egg grading and poultry products inspection services performed by employees of the United States Department of Agriculture.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Part of this section was reenacted by Acts 1987, No. 1025, § 2. Acts 1987, No. 834, provided that 1987 legislation reenacting acts passed in the 1976 Extended Session should not repeal any other 1987 legislation and that such other legislation would be controlling in the event of conflict.

Publisher's Notes. This section may be affected by §§2-33-113,19-5-302(8), and19-6-301(34).

History.

Acts 1965, No. 49, § 3; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1216, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-318, 78-320.2; reen. Acts 1987, No. 1025, § 2.

2-33-308. Overtime compensation.

The Department of Agriculture is hereby authorized to pay ordinary, customary, and necessary overtime compensation in accordance with rules promulgated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State to those employees, including egg and poultry grader supervisors, engaged in the inspection and grading of eggs and poultry products under the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission's Poultry and Egg Grading Program.

History.

Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 192, § 22; 2019, No. 910, § 30.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Agriculture” for “Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission's Poultry and Egg Grading Program”, and added “under the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission's Poultry and Egg Grading Program”.

Subchapter 4

— Other Divisions or Committees

2-33-401. [Repealed.]

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2007, No. 153, §3, provided:

“The following state agencies are abolished:

“(1)Advisory Board for Perinatal Health Services, created by §20-7-116;

“(2)Advisory Committee on Educational Access to Technology, created by §6-16-409;

“(3)Arkansas Classified Personnel Salaries Study Commission, created by §6-17-808; and

“(4)Arkansas Dairy Committee, created by §2-33-401.”

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the Arkansas Dairy Committee, was repealed by Acts 2007, No. 153, § 3. The section was derived from Acts 1997, No. 888, § 1.

2-33-107. Powers and duties generally.

2-33-111. Livestock and poultry diagnostic services.

2-33-113. Disposition of fees and revenues.

Subchapter 2

— Livestock Division

Subchapter 3

— Poultry Division